tests/tables/large.ctb
include ../../tables/latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
always aaaaa 1
always aaaab 1
always aaaac 1
always aaaad 1
always aaaae 1
always aaaaf 1
always aaaag 1
always aaaah 1
always aaaai 1
always aaaaj 1
always aaaak 1
always aaaal 1
always aaaam 1
always aaaan 1
always aaaao 1
always aaaap 1
always aaaaq 1
always aaaar 1
always aaaas 1
always aaaat 1
always aaaau 1
always aaaav 1
always aaaaw 1
always aaaax 1
always aaaay 1
always aaaaz 1
always aaaba 1
always aaabb 1
always aaabc 1
always aaabd 1
always aaabe 1
always aaabf 1
always aaabg 1
always aaabh 1
always aaabi 1
always aaabj 1
always aaabk 1
always aaabl 1
always aaabm 1
always aaabn 1
always aaabo 1
always aaabp 1
always aaabq 1
always aaabr 1
always aaabs 1
always aaabt 1
always aaabu 1
always aaabv 1
always aaabw 1
always aaabx 1
always aaaby 1
always aaabz 1
always aaaca 1
always aaacb 1
always aaacc 1
always aaacd 1
always aaace 1
always aaacf 1
always aaacg 1
always aaach 1
always aaaci 1
always aaacj 1
always aaack 1
always aaacl 1
always aaacm 1
always aaacn 1
always aaaco 1
always aaacp 1
always aaacq 1
always aaacr 1
always aaacs 1
always aaact 1
always aaacu 1
always aaacv 1
always aaacw 1
always aaacx 1
always aaacy 1
always aaacz 1
always aaada 1
always aaadb 1
always aaadc 1
always aaadd 1
always aaade 1
always aaadf 1
always aaadg 1
always aaadh 1
always aaadi 1
always aaadj 1
always aaadk 1
always aaadl 1
always aaadm 1
always aaadn 1
always aaado 1
always aaadp 1
always aaadq 1
always aaadr 1
always aaads 1
always aaadt 1
always aaadu 1
always aaadv 1
always aaadw 1
always aaadx 1
always aaady 1
always aaadz 1
always aaaea 1
always aaaeb 1
always aaaec 1
always aaaed 1
always aaaee 1
always aaaef 1
always aaaeg 1
always aaaeh 1
always aaaei 1
always aaaej 1
always aaaek 1
always aaael 1
always aaaem 1
always aaaen 1
always aaaeo 1
always aaaep 1
always aaaeq 1
always aaaer 1
always aaaes 1
always aaaet 1
always aaaeu 1
always aaaev 1
always aaaew 1
always aaaex 1
always aaaey 1
always aaaez 1
always aaafa 1
always aaafb 1
always aaafc 1
always aaafd 1
always aaafe 1
always aaaff 1
always aaafg 1
always aaafh 1
always aaafi 1
always aaafj 1
always aaafk 1
always aaafl 1
always aaafm 1
always aaafn 1
always aaafo 1
always aaafp 1
always aaafq 1
always aaafr 1
always aaafs 1
always aaaft 1
always aaafu 1
always aaafv 1
always aaafw 1
always aaafx 1
always aaafy 1
always aaafz 1
always aaaga 1
always aaagb 1
always aaagc 1
always aaagd 1
always aaage 1
always aaagf 1
always aaagg 1
always aaagh 1
always aaagi 1
always aaagj 1
always aaagk 1
always aaagl 1
always aaagm 1
always aaagn 1
always aaago 1
always aaagp 1
always aaagq 1
always aaagr 1
always aaags 1
always aaagt 1
always aaagu 1
always aaagv 1
always aaagw 1
always aaagx 1
always aaagy 1
always aaagz 1
always aaaha 1
always aaahb 1
always aaahc 1
always aaahd 1
always aaahe 1
always aaahf 1
always aaahg 1
always aaahh 1
always aaahi 1
always aaahj 1
always aaahk 1
always aaahl 1
always aaahm 1
always aaahn 1
always aaaho 1
always aaahp 1
always aaahq 1
always aaahr 1
always aaahs 1
always aaaht 1
always aaahu 1
always aaahv 1
always aaahw 1
always aaahx 1
always aaahy 1
always aaahz 1
always aaaia 1
always aaaib 1
always aaaic 1
always aaaid 1
always aaaie 1
always aaaif 1
always aaaig 1
always aaaih 1
always aaaii 1
always aaaij 1
always aaaik 1
always aaail 1
always aaaim 1
always aaain 1
always aaaio 1
always aaaip 1
always aaaiq 1
always aaair 1
always aaais 1
always aaait 1
always aaaiu 1
always aaaiv 1
always aaaiw 1
always aaaix 1
always aaaiy 1
always aaaiz 1
always aaaja 1
always aaajb 1
always aaajc 1
always aaajd 1
always aaaje 1
always aaajf 1
always aaajg 1
always aaajh 1
always aaaji 1
always aaajj 1
always aaajk 1
always aaajl 1
always aaajm 1
always aaajn 1
always aaajo 1
always aaajp 1
always aaajq 1
always aaajr 1
always aaajs 1
always aaajt 1
always aaaju 1
always aaajv 1
always aaajw 1
always aaajx 1
always aaajy 1
always aaajz 1
always aaaka 1
always aaakb 1
always aaakc 1
always aaakd 1
always aaake 1
always aaakf 1
always aaakg 1
always aaakh 1
always aaaki 1
always aaakj 1
always aaakk 1
always aaakl 1
always aaakm 1
always aaakn 1
always aaako 1
always aaakp 1
always aaakq 1
always aaakr 1
always aaaks 1
always aaakt 1
always aaaku 1
always aaakv 1
always aaakw 1
always aaakx 1
always aaaky 1
always aaakz 1
always aaala 1
always aaalb 1
always aaalc 1
always aaald 1
always aaale 1
always aaalf 1
always aaalg 1
always aaalh 1
always aaali 1
always aaalj 1
always aaalk 1
always aaall 1
always aaalm 1
always aaaln 1
always aaalo 1
always aaalp 1
always aaalq 1
always aaalr 1
always aaals 1
always aaalt 1
always aaalu 1
always aaalv 1
always aaalw 1
always aaalx 1
always aaaly 1
always aaalz 1
always aaama 1
always aaamb 1
always aaamc 1
always aaamd 1
always aaame 1
always aaamf 1
always aaamg 1
always aaamh 1
always aaami 1
always aaamj 1
always aaamk 1
always aaaml 1
always aaamm 1
always aaamn 1
always aaamo 1
always aaamp 1
always aaamq 1
always aaamr 1
always aaams 1
always aaamt 1
always aaamu 1
always aaamv 1
always aaamw 1
always aaamx 1
always aaamy 1
always aaamz 1
always aaana 1
always aaanb 1
always aaanc 1
always aaand 1
always aaane 1
always aaanf 1
always aaang 1
always aaanh 1
always aaani 1
always aaanj 1
always aaank 1
always aaanl 1
always aaanm 1
always aaann 1
always aaano 1
always aaanp 1
always aaanq 1
always aaanr 1
always aaans 1
always aaant 1
always aaanu 1
always aaanv 1
always aaanw 1
always aaanx 1
always aaany 1
always aaanz 1
always aaaoa 1
always aaaob 1
always aaaoc 1
always aaaod 1
always aaaoe 1
always aaaof 1
always aaaog 1
always aaaoh 1
always aaaoi 1
always aaaoj 1
always aaaok 1
always aaaol 1
always aaaom 1
always aaaon 1
always aaaoo 1
always aaaop 1
always aaaoq 1
always aaaor 1
always aaaos 1
always aaaot 1
always aaaou 1
always aaaov 1
always aaaow 1
always aaaox 1
always aaaoy 1
always aaaoz 1
always aaapa 1
always aaapb 1
always aaapc 1
always aaapd 1
always aaape 1
always aaapf 1
always aaapg 1
always aaaph 1
always aaapi 1
always aaapj 1
always aaapk 1
always aaapl 1
always aaapm 1
always aaapn 1
always aaapo 1
always aaapp 1
always aaapq 1
always aaapr 1
always aaaps 1
always aaapt 1
always aaapu 1
always aaapv 1
always aaapw 1
always aaapx 1
always aaapy 1
always aaapz 1
always aaaqa 1
always aaaqb 1
always aaaqc 1
always aaaqd 1
always aaaqe 1
always aaaqf 1
always aaaqg 1
always aaaqh 1
always aaaqi 1
always aaaqj 1
always aaaqk 1
always aaaql 1
always aaaqm 1
always aaaqn 1
always aaaqo 1
always aaaqp 1
always aaaqq 1
always aaaqr 1
always aaaqs 1
always aaaqt 1
always aaaqu 1
always aaaqv 1
always aaaqw 1
always aaaqx 1
always aaaqy 1
always aaaqz 1
always aaara 1
always aaarb 1
always aaarc 1
always aaard 1
always aaare 1
always aaarf 1
always aaarg 1
always aaarh 1
always aaari 1
always aaarj 1
always aaark 1
always aaarl 1
always aaarm 1
always aaarn 1
always aaaro 1
always aaarp 1
always aaarq 1
always aaarr 1
always aaars 1
always aaart 1
always aaaru 1
always aaarv 1
always aaarw 1
always aaarx 1
always aaary 1
always aaarz 1
always aaasa 1
always aaasb 1
always aaasc 1
always aaasd 1
always aaase 1
always aaasf 1
always aaasg 1
always aaash 1
always aaasi 1
always aaasj 1
always aaask 1
always aaasl 1
always aaasm 1
always aaasn 1
always aaaso 1
always aaasp 1
always aaasq 1
always aaasr 1
always aaass 1
always aaast 1
always aaasu 1
always aaasv 1
always aaasw 1
always aaasx 1
always aaasy 1
always aaasz 1
always aaata 1
always aaatb 1
always aaatc 1
always aaatd 1
always aaate 1
always aaatf 1
always aaatg 1
always aaath 1
always aaati 1
always aaatj 1
always aaatk 1
always aaatl 1
always aaatm 1
always aaatn 1
always aaato 1
always aaatp 1
always aaatq 1
always aaatr 1
always aaats 1
always aaatt 1
always aaatu 1
always aaatv 1
always aaatw 1
always aaatx 1
always aaaty 1
always aaatz 1
always aaaua 1
always aaaub 1
always aaauc 1
always aaaud 1
always aaaue 1
always aaauf 1
always aaaug 1
always aaauh 1
always aaaui 1
always aaauj 1
always aaauk 1
always aaaul 1
always aaaum 1
always aaaun 1
always aaauo 1
always aaaup 1
always aaauq 1
always aaaur 1
always aaaus 1
always aaaut 1
always aaauu 1
always aaauv 1
always aaauw 1
always aaaux 1
always aaauy 1
always aaauz 1
always aaava 1
always aaavb 1
always aaavc 1
always aaavd 1
always aaave 1
always aaavf 1
always aaavg 1
always aaavh 1
always aaavi 1
always aaavj 1
always aaavk 1
always aaavl 1
always aaavm 1
always aaavn 1
always aaavo 1
always aaavp 1
always aaavq 1
always aaavr 1
always aaavs 1
always aaavt 1
always aaavu 1
always aaavv 1
always aaavw 1
always aaavx 1
always aaavy 1
always aaavz 1
always aaawa 1
always aaawb 1
always aaawc 1
always aaawd 1
always aaawe 1
always aaawf 1
always aaawg 1
always aaawh 1
always aaawi 1
always aaawj 1
always aaawk 1
always aaawl 1
always aaawm 1
always aaawn 1
always aaawo 1
always aaawp 1
always aaawq 1
always aaawr 1
always aaaws 1
always aaawt 1
always aaawu 1
always aaawv 1
always aaaww 1
always aaawx 1
always aaawy 1
always aaawz 1
always aaaxa 1
always aaaxb 1
always aaaxc 1
always aaaxd 1
always aaaxe 1
always aaaxf 1
always aaaxg 1
always aaaxh 1
always aaaxi 1
always aaaxj 1
always aaaxk 1
always aaaxl 1
always aaaxm 1
always aaaxn 1
always aaaxo 1
always aaaxp 1
always aaaxq 1
always aaaxr 1
always aaaxs 1
always aaaxt 1
always aaaxu 1
always aaaxv 1
always aaaxw 1
always aaaxx 1
always aaaxy 1
always aaaxz 1
always aaaya 1
always aaayb 1
always aaayc 1
always aaayd 1
always aaaye 1
always aaayf 1
always aaayg 1
always aaayh 1
always aaayi 1
always aaayj 1
always aaayk 1
always aaayl 1
always aaaym 1
always aaayn 1
always aaayo 1
always aaayp 1
always aaayq 1
always aaayr 1
always aaays 1
always aaayt 1
always aaayu 1
always aaayv 1
always aaayw 1
always aaayx 1
always aaayy 1
always aaayz 1
always aaaza 1
always aaazb 1
always aaazc 1
always aaazd 1
always aaaze 1
always aaazf 1
always aaazg 1
always aaazh 1
always aaazi 1
always aaazj 1
always aaazk 1
always aaazl 1
always aaazm 1
always aaazn 1
always aaazo 1
always aaazp 1
always aaazq 1
always aaazr 1
always aaazs 1
always aaazt 1
always aaazu 1
always aaazv 1
always aaazw 1
always aaazx 1
always aaazy 1
always aaazz 1
always aabaa 1
always aabab 1
always aabac 1
always aabad 1
always aabae 1
always aabaf 1
always aabag 1
always aabah 1
always aabai 1
always aabaj 1
always aabak 1
always aabal 1
always aabam 1
always aaban 1
always aabao 1
always aabap 1
always aabaq 1
always aabar 1
always aabas 1
always aabat 1
always aabau 1
always aabav 1
always aabaw 1
always aabax 1
always aabay 1
always aabaz 1
always aabba 1
always aabbb 1
always aabbc 1
always aabbd 1
always aabbe 1
always aabbf 1
always aabbg 1
always aabbh 1
always aabbi 1
always aabbj 1
always aabbk 1
always aabbl 1
always aabbm 1
always aabbn 1
always aabbo 1
always aabbp 1
always aabbq 1
always aabbr 1
always aabbs 1
always aabbt 1
always aabbu 1
always aabbv 1
always aabbw 1
always aabbx 1
always aabby 1
always aabbz 1
always aabca 1
always aabcb 1
always aabcc 1
always aabcd 1
always aabce 1
always aabcf 1
always aabcg 1
always aabch 1
always aabci 1
always aabcj 1
always aabck 1
always aabcl 1
always aabcm 1
always aabcn 1
always aabco 1
always aabcp 1
always aabcq 1
always aabcr 1
always aabcs 1
always aabct 1
always aabcu 1
always aabcv 1
always aabcw 1
always aabcx 1
always aabcy 1
always aabcz 1
always aabda 1
always aabdb 1
always aabdc 1
always aabdd 1
always aabde 1
always aabdf 1
always aabdg 1
always aabdh 1
always aabdi 1
always aabdj 1
always aabdk 1
always aabdl 1
always aabdm 1
always aabdn 1
always aabdo 1
always aabdp 1
always aabdq 1
always aabdr 1
always aabds 1
always aabdt 1
always aabdu 1
always aabdv 1
always aabdw 1
always aabdx 1
always aabdy 1
always aabdz 1
always aabea 1
always aabeb 1
always aabec 1
always aabed 1
always aabee 1
always aabef 1
always aabeg 1
always aabeh 1
always aabei 1
always aabej 1
always aabek 1
always aabel 1
always aabem 1
always aaben 1
always aabeo 1
always aabep 1
always aabeq 1
